Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.440

Time and place for convention.

The convention shall be held not less than five nor more than eight months from the date of the first publication of the proclamation provided for in RCW 29A.56.420. It shall be held in the chambers of the state house of representatives unless the governor shall select some other place at the state capitol.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1433. Prior: 1965 c 9 s 29.74.040; prior: 1933 c 181 s 1, part; RRS s 5249-1, part. Formerly RCW 29.74.040.]